Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.384

Membership.

(1) A credit union may admit to membership those persons qualified for membership as set forth in its bylaws.

(2) An organization whose membership, ownership, or employees are comprised principally of persons who are eligible for membership in the credit union may become a member of the credit union.

[ 1997 c 397 s 27; 1984 c 31 s 16. Formerly RCW 31.12.145.]